Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 2 Council on Aging

49-6-20.
Council created; appointment and terms of members; officers; rules; meetings.

There is created the Council on Aging. The council shall be composed of 20 members, at least ten of whom shall be consumers of services under programs of the Division of Aging Services of the Department of Human Services or similar state agencies. The ten consumer members shall include low income and minority older persons at least in proportion to their number in the population of the state. The remaining ten members of the council shall be representative of major public and private agencies and organizations in the state and shall be experienced in or have demonstrated particular interest in the needs of the elderly. The members of the council shall be appointed as follows:

Four consumer members and four members representing public and private agencies and organizations shall be appointed by the Governor;

Two consumer members and two members representing public and private agencies and organizations shall be appointed by the President of the Senate;

Two consumer members and two members representing public and private agencies and organizations shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House; and

Two consumer members and two members representing public and private agencies and organizations shall be appointed by the commissioner.

Each member’s term shall be for two years and until his successor is appointed and qualified. The members of the council shall be eligible to succeed themselves. The council shall elect its own chairman and such other officers as it deems necessary. The council may adopt rules and procedures. The council shall meet upon the call of its chairman, the board, or the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1219; Ga. L. 1977, p. 815, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 2-2, 2-5/HB 228.

49-6-21.
Duties and powers of council.

The Council on Aging shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Governor, the General Assembly, the board, the department, and all other state agencies in matters relating to the elderly. In particular, the council shall:

Make recommendations concerning the establishment and maintenance of an adequate program for the elderly in Georgia;

Recommend standards for services for the elderly;

Aid the department and other state agencies in coordinating programs for the elderly;

Establish indices to determine the effectiveness of programs for the aged;

Ensure that regular, adequate, and accurate reports are submitted by the component parts of aging programs to the council;

Publish in print or electronically regular reports of the council’s activities and the adequacy of state programs for the aged; and

Establish liaison with area agency councils on aging.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 815, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

49-6-21.1.
[Repealed] Additional duties and powers of council; report and recommendations.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-21.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 366, § 1/SB 341; repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 366, § 1/SB 341, effective January 1, 2011.

49-6-22.
Staff and facilities; expenses of council members.

The Council on Aging shall be provided with staff personnel, office facilities, and other necessary items by the department. Each member of the council shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of his duties from funds available to the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 815, § 3.